Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 1
ELECTIONS GENERALLY

Editor's note:

Articles 1 to 13 were repealed and reenacted in 1980, and this article was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 1992, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1992, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume and the editor's note following the title heading. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated in 1992. For a detailed comparison of this article for 1980 and 1992, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Law reviews:

For a discussion of a Tenth

C

ircuit decision dealing with elections, see 66 Den. U.L. Rev. 757 (1989); for article, "Psst-There's a New Election

C

ode", see 22 Colo. Law. 1703 (1993); for article, "Hey, They Revised the Election Code Again!", see 23 Colo. Law. 1821 (1994); for article, "Yes, Even More Election Code Revisions", see 24 Colo. Law. 1803 (1995); for article, "Fill in the Blank: More ____ Election Code Revisions", see 25 Colo. Law. 93 (Aug. 1996); for article, "Wow, What a Surprise! Still More Election Code Revisions", see 26 Colo. Law. 77 (Aug. 1997); for article, "Florida Fallout and Other Colorado Election Law Amendments of 2002", see 31 Colo. Law. 63 (Aug. 2002).

Section

PART 1 DEFINITIONS AND GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 TERMS OF OFFICE

PART 3 TRAINING AND CERTIFICATION OF ELECTION OFFICIALS

PART 4 ELECTION REFORM COMMISSION